Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 8 Miscellaneous Provisions

47-3-140.
Application of other state funded pension or retirement benefits to members and beneficiaries of this retirement system.

Except as specifically provided in this chapter, no other provision of law which provides wholly or partly at the expense of this state for pensions or retirement benefits for teachers in the state, their surviving spouses, or their dependents shall apply to members or beneficiaries of this retirement system, their surviving spouses, or their dependents, provided that nothing in this chapter shall prevent the governing boards of the public school systems of the state and the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia from making provision for supplementing the retirement and pension allowances of members of the retirement system.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 13; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1197, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 698, § 1.

Cross references.

Authority of governing boards of public school systems and board of regents to provide supplemental retirement and pension allowances, §§

20-1-2

,

20-1-4

.

47-3-141.
Attempts to defraud the retirement system by means of false statements or falsified records; adjustment of erroneous payments.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statements or falsifies or permits to be falsified any records of the retirement system in any attempt to defraud the retirement system, as a result of such act, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction shall be punished by a fine not exceeding $500.00, imprisonment not exceeding 12 months, or both.

If any change or error in the records of the retirement system results in any member or beneficiary receiving from the retirement system more or less than he would have been entitled to receive had the records been correct, the board of trustees shall have the power to correct such error and to adjust the payments as far as practicable in such a manner that the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which such member or beneficiary was correctly entitled shall be paid.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 11.

47-3-142.
Rights and benefits of persons convicted of murder, voluntary manslaughter, or conspiracy to commit either upon a member or retiree.

No person who commits or conspires to commit the murder or voluntary manslaughter of a member or retiree shall receive any refund of contributions or retirement benefits under this chapter upon the death of the member or retiree, even though the person so killing or conspiring is the named beneficiary for such refund of contributions or retirement benefits. A plea of guilty or a judicial finding of guilt, not reversed or otherwise set aside as to any of such crimes, shall be prima-facie evidence of guilt in determining rights under this chapter. All right, interest, and entitlement to any such refund of contributions or retirement benefits shall go to the secondary beneficiary designated by the member or retiree, if the secondary beneficiary is living, upon the death of the member or retiree, otherwise to the member’s or retiree’s estate.

History.

Ga. L. 1979, p. 918, § 1.